Illinois, session 104th, HB2669.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Board of Higher Education Act is amended by 5adding Section 9.45 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 205/9.45 new)7    Sec. 9.45. Teaching assistant class limit. The Board shall 8set, by rule, the maximum amount of classes a teaching 9assistant may teach without a professor, instructor, or 10teacher present.